Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-431
Nebraska Habitat Fund; Nebraska Aquatic Habitat Fund; created; use; investment; stamps; fees; disposition; duties of officials; violation; penalty.

(1)(a) The Nebraska Habitat Fund is created. The commission shall remit fees received for annual and multiple-year habitat stamps and annual and multiple-year Nebraska migratory waterfowl stamps to the State Treasurer for credit to the Nebraska Habitat Fund. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Fees received and income from such investments may be expended by the commission pursuant to section 37-432.

(b) Fees received for lifetime habitat stamps and lifetime Nebraska migratory waterfowl stamps under the Game Law shall be credited to the Nebraska Habitat Fund. Twenty-five percent of the fees for such stamps shall not be expended but may be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Income from such investments may be expended by the commission pursuant to section 37-432.

(2)(a) The Nebraska Aquatic Habitat Fund is created. The commission shall remit fees received for annual and multiple-year aquatic habitat stamps and one dollar of the one-day fishing permit fee as provided in section 37-426 to the State Treasurer for credit to the Nebraska Aquatic Habitat Fund. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Fees received and income from such investments may be expended by the commission pursuant to section 37-432.

(b) Fees received for lifetime aquatic habitat stamps shall be credited to the Nebraska Aquatic Habitat Fund. Twenty-five percent of the fees for such stamps shall not be expended but may be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Income from such investments may be expended by the commission pursuant to section 37-432.

(3) The secretary of the commission and any county clerk or public official designated to sell habitat stamps, aquatic habitat stamps, or Nebraska migratory waterfowl stamps shall be liable upon their official bonds or equivalent commercial insurance policy for failure to remit the money from the sale of the stamps, as required by sections 37-426 to 37-433, coming into their hands. Any agent who receives stamp fees and who fails to remit the fees to the commission within a reasonable time after demand by the commission shall be liable to the commission in damages for double the amount of the funds wrongfully withheld. Any agent who purposefully fails to remit such fees with the intention of converting them is guilty of theft. The penalty for such violation shall be determined by the amount converted as specified in section 28-518.

Laws 1976, LB 861, § 13;

Laws 1983, LB 174, § 7;

Laws 1996, LB 584, § 15;

R.S.Supp.,1996, § 37-216.07;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 141;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 31;

Laws 2001, LB 111, § 8;

Laws 2004, LB 884, § 19;

Laws 2005, LB 162, § 12;

Laws 2007, LB299, § 6;

Laws 2009, LB105, § 11;

Laws 2011, LB41, § 11;

Laws 2026, LB979, § 9.
July 18, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.